Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska73-104
Fair labor standards, defined.

Fair labor standards, as used in sections 73-102 and 73-103 shall be construed to mean such a scale of wages and conditions of employment as are paid and maintained by at least fifty percent of the contractors in the same business or field of endeavor as the contractor filing such statement.

Laws 1939, c. 55, § 2, p. 227;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 73-103;

R.S.1943, § 73-104.

Provision for payment of a sum no less than going wage is a proper fair labor standard, while payment of fixed sum irrespective of going wage is not. Philson v. City of Omaha, 167 Neb. 360, 93 N.W.2d 13 (1958).

Home rule charter controlled contract for improvement of water system. Niklaus v. Miller, 159 Neb. 301, 66 N.W.2d 824 (1954).